Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202653-171
Licenses; issuance of more than one kind to same person; when unlawful; craft brewery, manufacturer, or microdistillery licensee; limitations.

(1) No person licensed as a wholesaler of alcoholic liquor shall be permitted to receive any retail license at the same time. No person licensed as a manufacturer shall be permitted to receive any retail license at the same time except as set forth in subsection (2) of section 53-123.01 with respect to the manufacture, distribution, and retail sale of beer, and the Nebraska Liquor Control Act shall not be construed to permit the holder of a manufacturer's license issued pursuant to such subsection to engage in the wholesale distribution of alcoholic liquor. No person licensed as a retailer of alcoholic liquor shall be permitted to receive any manufacturer's or wholesale license at the same time.

(2) This section shall not apply to the holder of a farm winery license. The holder of a craft brewery license shall have the privileges and duties listed in section 53-123.14 with respect to the manufacture, distribution, and retail sale of beer, and except as provided in subsection (2) of section 53-123.14, the Nebraska Liquor Control Act shall not be construed to permit the holder of a craft brewery license to engage in the wholesale distribution of beer. The holder of a microdistillery license shall have the privileges and duties listed in section 53-123.16 with respect to the manufacture of alcoholic liquor, and except as provided in subsection (2) of section 53-123.16, the Nebraska Liquor Control Act shall not be construed to permit the holder of a microdistillery license to engage in the wholesale distribution of alcoholic liquor.

Laws 1935, c. 116, § 30, p. 397;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 53-330;

R.S.1943, § 53-171;

Laws 1953, c. 182, § 1, p. 573;

Laws 1969, c. 441, § 4, p. 1478;

Laws 1985, LB 279, § 12;

Laws 1988, LB 1089, § 25;

Laws 1991, LB 344, § 56;

Laws 1996, LB 750, § 12;

Laws 2007, LB549, § 18;

Laws 2016, LB1105, § 26;

Laws 2022, LB1236, § 6;

Laws 2023, LB376, § 14.